District of Columbia statutes.
24-803

Enforcement and cooperation required of parties.

All courts, departments, agencies, officers, and employees of the United States and of the District of Columbia are hereby directed to enforce the Agreement on Detainers and to cooperate with one another and with all party states in enforcing the agreement and effectuating its purpose.

Dec. 9, 1970, 84 Stat. 1402, Pub. L. 91-538, § 5
1981 Ed., § 24-703.
1973 Ed., § 24-703.